Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.630.135

Work-integrated learning.

(1) The work-integrated learning initiative is established. The purpose of the initiative is to promote work-integrated learning experiences for students by providing:

(a) An opportunity for students to engage in work-based academic programs with public and private sector employers, such as internships, externships, and registered apprenticeships; and

(b) A framework for the development and replication of successful work-integrated learning programs throughout the state.

(2) Local applicant schools receiving funding through participation in the initiative must:

(a) Provide academic curricula in a work-integrated and career-contextualized manner and include an external mentor for each student in the program;

(b) Demonstrate collaboration with and input from students, parents or guardians, local employers, community members, a workforce development council, and a labor organization. Evidence of local collaborations may include but are not limited to partnerships with a dropout reengagement organization, an apprenticeship sponsor, a community and technical college, a STEM network, or a homeless youth service organization;

(c) Reflect local circumstances, including local industries, employers, and labor markets;

(d) Comply with graduation requirements established by the state board of education; and

(e) Align the high school and beyond plans of participating students to reflect opportunities that may be available through the initiative.

(3)(a) Local applicant schools selected to participate in the work-integrated learning initiative must, in accordance with this section and RCW 28A.300.196, submit to the work-integrated learning advisory committee created in RCW 28A.300.196 an interim and an end-of-project report that includes numeric and other data summarizing the effects of their work-integrated learning project programs on high school graduation rates, state test scores, and community partnerships, including partnerships with local employers and industries.

(b) In complying with this subsection (3), local applicant schools must also provide other data and information as requested by the work-integrated learning advisory committee in accordance with RCW 28A.300.196.

(4) For the purposes of this section and RCW 28A.300.195 and 28A.300.196, "work-integrated learning" includes but is not limited to early, frequent, and systematic learning experiences that are essential for preparing Washington youth for high-demand, family-wage jobs in Washington state, and that engage students in grades five through twelve or through high school dropout reengagement plans.

[ 2018 c 206 s 1.]